Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2143
Community Development Law, how construed.

The powers conferred by the Community Development Law shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered in the Community Development Law and shall be considered as a complete and independent act and not as amendatory of or limited by any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska. Notwithstanding any other evidence of legislative intent, it is hereby declared to be the controlling legislative intent that if any provision of the Community Development Law, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect the other provisions of the Community Development Law or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances. The Community Development Law and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion made to a city and to an authority created under the Community Development Law shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect the Community Development Law are hereby expressly granted to and conferred upon a city or an authority created pursuant thereto.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 23, p. 820;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1643;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 17, p. 242;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2643;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 31.
July 19, 2018